Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-2012
Municipal solid waste jurisdiction area, defined.

Municipal solid waste jurisdiction area shall mean all the incorporated areas of a city or of a village.

Laws 1992, LB 1257, § 12.